District of Columbia statutes.
38-3201

Mayor to provide notice to Board when locating certain facilities near schools.

(a)

The Mayor shall give at least 60 days written notice to the District of Columbia Board of Education or the governing body of a private or parochial school of the proposed establishment of a homeless shelter, correctional facility, halfway house, or drug treatment center, to be located within 400 feet of a school, or adjacent school grounds in the District of Columbia, used for the instruction of minors.

(b)

The Mayor shall give great weight to written comments of the District of Columbia Board of Education in regard to the establishment or current operation of a homeless shelter, correctional facility, halfway house, or drug treatment center located within 400 feet of a District of Columbia public school, of the adjacent school grounds, used for the instruction of minors.

May 21, 1992, D.C. Law 10-255, § 2, 39 DCR 2149